District of Columbia statutes.
6-915

Neglect by tenants or occupants.

If an uninhabitable or insanitary condition which has led to the condemnation of a building or part of building has been caused in any part by the action or by the neglect of the tenant or tenants, occupant or occupants thereof, such tenant, tenants, occupant, or occupants shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be liable to the penalties provided in § 6-916.

May 1, 1906, ch. 2073, § 15
Aug. 28, 1954, 68 Stat. 889, ch. 1032
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 103(h), 48 DCR 1888

History

This section is referenced in § 6-916.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 5-715.
1973 Ed., § 5-630.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-281 substituted “If an uninhabitable or insanitary condition” for “Whenever any insanitary condition”.

Effect of Amendments